Washington statutes.
RCW 18.134.040

Professional practice standard.

(1) A health care practitioner who provides telehealth services to a patient located in this state shall provide the services in compliance with the professional practice standards applicable to a health care practitioner who provides comparable in-person health care in this state. Professional practice standards and law applicable to the provision of health care in this state, including standards and law relating to prescribing medication or treatment, identity verification, documentation, informed consent, confidentiality, privacy, and security, apply to the provision of telehealth services in this state.

(2) A disciplining authority in this state shall not adopt or enforce a rule that establishes a different professional practice standard for telehealth services merely because the services are provided through telehealth or limits the telecommunication technology that may be used for telehealth services.

[ 2024 c 212 s 5.]